Maine, session 132, LD754.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1560-C is enacted to read:
§1560-C. Single-use electronic nicotine delivery device
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Electronic nicotine delivery device" has the same meaning as in section 1560-B,
subsection 1, paragraph B.
B. "Single-use electronic nicotine delivery device" means an electronic nicotine
delivery device that is designed for one-time use and is not rechargeable.
2. Prohibition on sale. A person may not sell or offer to sell a single-use electronic
nicotine delivery device.
3. Prohibition on use or possession. A person may not use or possess a single-use
electronic nicotine delivery device.
4. Penalties. A person that violates this section:
A. Commits a civil violation for which a fine of $500 may be adjudged;
B. After having previously violated this section, commits a civil violation for which a
fine of $1,000 may be adjudged; and
C. After having previously violated this section more than once, commits a civil
violation for which a fine of $5,000 may be adjudged.
Sec. 2. Department of Environmental Protection to convene stakeholder
group. The Department of Environmental Protection shall convene a stakeholder group
of interested parties to review the feasibility and viability of establishing an extended
producer responsibility approach to all batteries not currently covered by an extended
producer responsibility requirement, including, but not limited to, batteries used in
electronic cigarettes, electronic cigars, electronic pipes, electronic hookahs and so-called
vape pens. By December 3, 2025, the department shall submit a report related to the review
to the Joint Standing Committee on Environment and Natural Resources, which may
submit legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature.